Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142B.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 7a. new text end new text begin Staff distribution. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Rules, part 9503.0040, subpart 2, item B, an aide may substitute for a teacher during morning arrival and afternoon departure times in a licensed child care center if the total arrival and departure time does not exceed 25 percent of the center's daily hours of operation. In order for an aide to be used in this capacity, an aide must: new text end new text begin (1) be at least 18 years of age; new text end new text begin (2) have worked in the licensed child care center for a minimum of 30 days; and new text end new text begin (3) have completed all preservice and first-90-days training required for licensing. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end